Rhode Island statutes. Title 33 Probate Practice and Procedure
Chapter 20 Absentees’ Estates

33-20-1.
Grounds for appointment of receiver.

If a resident of this state, having property in this state, has disappeared, has been absent from his or her usual place of residence, his or her whereabouts have been unknown for more than one year, and he or she has left no agent in charge of his or her property, the court of probate of the town in which he or she was last known to reside shall have power upon the petition of the spouse, next of kin, or of one or more of his or her creditors, setting forth the above facts, to appoint a receiver to collect and take charge of the property until the fact of the death or survival of the absentee is established, and in case of his or her death, until an executor or administrator shall be appointed and qualified.

If there shall be no petition by the spouse, next of kin, or creditors filed within five (5) years after the resident’s whereabouts have been unknown, all of the personalty of the resident who has disappeared or whose whereabouts are unknown shall be subject to the provisions of chapters 21 and 21.1 of this title.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 927; G.L. 1909, ch. 315, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 366, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 581, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

33-20-1

; P.L. 1961, ch. 195, § 3; P.L. 1971, ch. 187, § 1.

33-20-2.
Notice as to appointment of receiver.

The court before appointing a receiver shall give at least thirty (30) days’ notice by publication in one or more newspaper published in the state, in the manner provided for petitions for appointment of administrators, and by mailing a copy of the notice to the last known address of the absentee. This notice shall be addressed to the absentee and to all persons who claim an interest in the property, and to all whom it may concern, citing them to appear at a time and place named and show cause why a receiver of the property of the absentee should not be appointed. The court may order other and further notice to be given within or outside the state.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 928; G.L. 1909, ch. 315, § 2; G.L. 1923, ch. 366, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 581, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

33-20-2

.

33-20-3.
Wartime meaning of last known address.

During such time as the United States shall be engaged in any war, the term “last known address”, as used in §

33-20-2

, shall be construed to mean the last known address within the confines of the United States.

History of Section.

G.L., ch. 581, § 9, as enacted by P.L. 1944, ch. 1485, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

33-20-3

.

33-20-4.
Show of cause against appointment of receiver — Receiver’s bond.

Any person may appear and show cause why the prayer of the petitioner should not be granted. If a receiver is appointed, he or she shall give bond to the probate court in such sum and with such conditions as the court orders, with surety satisfactory to the court.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 929; G.L. 1909, ch. 315, § 3; G.L. 1923, ch. 366, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 581, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

33-20-4

.

33-20-5.
Orders for management or sale of property.

The court may make orders for the care, custody, leasing, and investing of the property and its proceeds. The court may order livestock or perishable property, or any property, which cannot be kept without great and disproportionate expense, to be sold at public or private sale. The court may, upon petition of the receiver, and after the notice as is required in case of sale of real estate by executors and administrators, order all or any part of the real and personal estate of the absentee to be sold at public or private sale to supply money for the payments authorized by §§

33-20-1

—

33-20-7

or for reinvestment approved by the court. The court, on petition with notice, if satisfied that the action will not be prejudicial to the interests of the estate, may authorize the petitioner to become the purchaser of the real estate, at public or private sale; provided, however, that, in any instance, if the sale is made by private contract, the sale shall be made for not less than the sum fixed by the court in its decree authorizing the sale.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 930; G.L. 1909, ch. 315, § 4; G.L. 1923, ch. 366, § 4; G.L. 1938, ch. 581, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

33-20-5

; P.L. 1968, ch. 94, § 1.

33-20-6.
Maintenance of wife and children — Payment of debts.

The probate court may authorize the receiver to apply the income of the property, and if the income is insufficient, then the property or the proceeds of any sale thereof, in payment of charges incurred, or that may be incurred, in the support and maintenance of the absentee’s wife and minor children and to the payment of such debts as may be proved against the absentee before the probate court.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 931; G.L. 1909, ch. 315, § 5; G.L. 1923, ch. 366, § 5; G.L. 1938, ch. 581, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

33-20-6

.

33-20-7.
Compensation of and disbursements by receiver.

The receiver shall be allowed such compensation and such disbursements, to be paid out of the income, property, or proceeds, as the probate court may approve.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 932; G.L. 1909, ch. 315, § 6; G.L. 1923, ch. 366, § 6; G.L. 1938, ch. 581, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

33-20-7

.

33-20-8.
Conservatorship for military absentee.

Whenever a person, hereinafter referred to as an absentee, who while serving in or with the armed forces of the United States, or while serving as a merchant seaman, has been reported or listed as missing, or missing in action, or interned in a neutral country, or beleaguered, besieged, or captured by an enemy, has an interest in any form of property in this state or is a legal resident of this state and has not provided an adequate power of attorney authorizing another to act in his or her behalf in regard to his or her property or interest, then, the probate court of the city or town of the absentee’s legal domicile or of the city or town where the property is situated, upon petition alleging the foregoing facts and showing the necessity for providing care of the property of the absentee made by any person who would have an interest in the property of the absentee were the absentee deceased, or on the court’s own motion, after notice to, or on receipt of proper waivers from, the heirs and next of kin of the absentee as provided by law for the administration of an estate, and upon good cause being shown, may, after finding the facts to be as provided in this section, appoint a conservator to take charge of the absentee’s estate, under the supervision and subject to the further orders of the court.

History of Section.

P.L. 1946, ch. 1710, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

33-20-8

.

33-20-9.
Person appointed as conservator — Bond — Powers.

The court shall have full discretionary authority to appoint any suitable person as conservator and may require the conservator to post an adequate surety bond and to make such reports as the court may deem necessary. The conservator shall have the same powers and authority as the guardian of the property of an infant or incompetent and shall be considered as an officer or arm of the court.

History of Section.

P.L. 1946, ch. 1710, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

33-20-9

.

33-20-10.
Termination of conservatorship.

At any time upon petition signed by the absentee, or on petition of any attorney in fact acting under an adequate power of attorney granted by the absentee, the court shall direct the termination of the conservatorship and the transfer of all property held under the conservatorship to the absentee or to the designated attorney in fact. Likewise, if at any time subsequent to the appointment of a conservator it shall appear that the absentee has died and an executor or administrator has been appointed for his or her estate, the court shall direct the termination of the conservatorship and the transfer of all property of the deceased absentee held under the conservatorship to the executor or administrator.

History of Section.

P.L. 1946, ch. 1710, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

33-20-10

.

33-20-11.
Escheat of excess funds.

Any personalty remaining in the hands of the probate court under the provisions of this chapter after payment of all claims on the absentees’ estate, if there are no heirs or next of kin known to be surviving, shall be subject to the provisions of chapters 21 and 21.1 of this title.

History of Section.

G.L., §

33-20-11

, as enacted by P.L. 1961, ch. 195, § 4.